North Dakota statutes. TITLE 57 Taxation
CHAPTER 57-39.2 Sales Tax
57-39.2-03.10.
Bundled telecommunications services including exempt services.

In the case of a bundled transaction of services that includes telecommunications services, if the price is attributable to services that are taxable and services that are nontaxable, the portion of the price attributable to the nontaxable services is subject to tax under this chapter and chapter 57-40.2 unless the provider can reasonably identify the nontaxable portion of the services from its books and records kept in the regular course of business.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 570, § 1.

57-39.2-04.
Exemptions. [Effective September 1, 2022]

There are specifically exempted from the provisions of this chapter and from computation of the amount of tax imposed by it the following:

Gross receipts from sales of tangible personal property which this state is prohibited from taxing under the Constitution or laws of the United States or under the Constitution of North Dakota.

Gross receipts from the sales, furnishing, or service of passenger transportation service and gross receipts from the sales, furnishing, or service of freight transportation service when provided by a common carrier.

Repealed by S.L. 1971, ch. 567, § 1.

Gross receipts from sales of tickets, or admissions to state, county, district, and local fairs.

Gross receipts from educational, religious, or charitable activities when the entire amount of net receipts is expended for educational, religious, or charitable purposes. The exemption in this subdivision does not apply to:

Gross receipts from taxable sales in excess of ten thousand dollars for an event if the activities are held in a publicly owned facility which is not an event otherwise exempt under subdivision c, d, or e; or

Gross receipts from activities if the seller competes with retailers by maintaining inventory, conducting retail sales on a regular basis from a permanent or seasonal location, or soliciting sales from a website prepared for or maintained by the seller.

Gross receipts derived by an institution of higher education located in this state from tickets or admissions to athletic, musical, dramatic, or scholastic events held, sponsored, hosted, or controlled by the institution of higher education, in which the primary performers or participants consist of students of an institution of higher education.

Gross receipts derived by any public school district if such receipts are expended in accordance with section 15.1-07-10 or 15.1-07-11.

Gross receipts of a nonprofit music or dramatic arts organization that is exempt from federal income taxation and is organized and operated for the presentation of live public performances of musical or theatrical works on a regular basis.

Gross receipts from sales of textbooks to regularly enrolled students of a private or public school and from sales of textbooks, yearbooks, and school supplies purchased by a private nonprofit elementary school, secondary school, or any other nonprofit institution of higher learning conducting courses of study similar to those conducted by public schools in this state.

Gross receipts from all sales otherwise taxable under this chapter made to the United States, an Indian tribe, or to any state, including the state of North Dakota, or any of the subdivisions, departments, agencies, or institutions of any state. A political subdivision of another state is exempt under this subsection only if a sale to a North Dakota political subdivision is treated as an exempt sale in that state. The governmental units exempted by this subsection must be issued a certificate of exemption by the commissioner and the certificate must be presented to each retailer whenever this exemption is claimed. For purposes of this subsection, an Indian tribe means a tribal government agency, instrumentality, or political subdivision that performs essential government functions and does not include business entities or agencies the primary purpose of which is to operate a business enterprise.

Gross receipts from the sale of drugs sold under a doctor’s prescription.

Gross receipts from sales of adjuvants, agrichemical tank cleaners and foam markers, commercial fertilizers, fungicides, seed treatments, inoculants and fumigants, herbicides, and insecticides to agricultural or commercial vegetable producers and commercial applicators; chemicals used to preserve agricultural crops being stored; and seeds, roots, bulbs, and small plants to commercial users or consumers for planting or transplanting for commercial vegetable gardens or agricultural purposes.

Gross receipts from sales of oxygen sold to any person who purchases it upon the written order of a doctor for the person’s own use for medical purposes.

Gross receipts from the sale of motor vehicles, farm machinery, alcoholic beverages, gasoline, insurance premiums, gaming tickets, or any other article or product, except as otherwise provided, upon which the state of North Dakota imposes a special tax.

Gross receipts from the sale of feed which is fed to poultry or livestock, including breeding stock and wool-bearing stock, for the purpose of producing eggs, milk, meat, fibers, or other products for human consumption and the gross receipts from the sale of feed purchased for the purpose of being fed to draft or fur-bearing animals. The word “feed” as used herein shall be construed to mean and include only salt, grains, hays, tankage, oyster shells, mineral supplements, limestone, molasses, beet pulp, meat and bone scraps, meal, drugs to be used as part of a feed ration, and other generally recognized animal feeds. The term “feed” includes drugs used as part of a feed ration, medicants, disinfectants, wormers, tonics, and like items.

Gross receipts from a sale otherwise taxable under this chapter made to a person from an adjoining state which does not impose or levy a retail sales tax, under the following conditions:

The person is in the state of North Dakota for the express purpose of making a purchase.

The person furnishes to the North Dakota retailer a certificate signed by the person in a form as the commissioner may prescribe reciting sufficient facts establishing the exempt status of the sale. Unless the certificate is furnished it must be presumed, until the contrary is shown, that the person was not in the state of North Dakota for the express purpose of making a purchase.

The sale is fifty dollars or more.

Gross receipts from the sale of any motor vehicle taxable under the provisions of the motor vehicle excise tax laws of North Dakota. However, gross receipts from the rental of any motor vehicle for fewer than thirty days are not exempt but taxes imposed under home rule authority do not apply to such rentals.

Repealed by S.L. 1969, ch. 528, § 24.

Gross receipts from sales in which a contractor furnishes to the retailer a certificate which includes the contractor’s license number assigned to the contractor under the provisions of chapter 43-07. Such certificate shall be in the form prescribed by the commissioner and shall be furnished by the contractor to the retailer each calendar year prior to the making of any purchases during such calendar year from the retailer without liability for paying the tax to the retailer. Any contractor furnishing such certificate must report and remit the tax to the commissioner on purchases taxable under this chapter made by the contractor in the same manner as retailers remit such tax under this chapter.

Gross receipts from the sale of newsprint and ink used in the publication of a newspaper.

Gross receipts from the sale of all services furnished by any hospital, infirmary, sanatorium, nursing home, basic care facility, or similar institution to any patient or occupant.

Repealed by S.L. 1973, ch. 480, § 6.

Repealed by S.L. 1971, ch. 555, § 3.

Gross receipts from the sale of food supplies to any public school, to any parochial or private nonprofit school conducting courses of study similar to those conducted by public schools in this state, or to any nonprofit organization, for use by the public, parochial, or private school or nonprofit organization in sponsoring or conducting a lunch program or programs in and for any such public, parochial, or private nonprofit school.

Gross receipts from the leasing or renting of motion picture film to motion picture exhibitors for exhibition if the sale of tickets or admissions to the exhibition of the film is subject to the sales tax imposed by this chapter.

Gross receipts from the leasing or renting of manufactured homes, modular living units, or sectional homes, whether or not placed on a permanent foundation, for residential housing for periods of thirty or more consecutive days and the gross receipts from the leasing or renting of a hotel or motel room or other accommodations occupied by the same person or persons for residential housing for periods of thirty or more consecutive days.

Food purchased by a student under a boarding contract with a college, university, fraternity, or sorority.

Gross receipts from all sales when made to an eligible facility or emergency medical services provider for the use or benefit of its patient or occupant. For the purposes of this subsection:

“Eligible facility” means any hospital, skilled nursing facility, intermediate care facility, basic care facility, or any assisted living facility licensed by the department of health and human services; and

“Emergency medical services provider” means an emergency medical services operation licensed by the department of health and human services under chapter 23-27.

Gross receipts from the sale of Bibles, hymnals, textbooks, and prayerbooks sold to nonprofit religious organizations.

Gross receipts from sales of prosthetic devices, durable medical equipment, mobility-enhancing equipment, or supplies for ostomy care or bladder dysfunction. For purposes of this subsection:

“Durable medical equipment” means equipment, not including mobility-enhancing equipment, for home use, including repair and replacement parts for such equipment, which:

Can withstand repeated use;

Is primarily and customarily used to serve a medical purpose;

Generally is not useful to a person in the absence of illness or injury; and

Is not worn in or on the body.

“Mobility-enhancing equipment” means equipment, not including durable medical equipment sold under a doctor’s written prescription, including repair and replacement parts for mobility-enhancing equipment, which:

Is primarily and customarily used to provide or increase the ability to move from one place to another and which is appropriate for use either at home or in a motor vehicle;

Is not generally used by persons with normal mobility; and

Does not include any motor vehicle or equipment on a motor vehicle normally provided by a motor vehicle manufacturer.

“Prosthetic device” means a replacement, corrective, or supportive device sold under a doctor’s written prescription, including repair and replacement parts for such a device, worn on or in the body to:

Artificially replace a missing portion of the body;

Prevent or correct a physical deformity or malfunction; or

Support a weak or deformed portion of the body.

“Supplies for ostomy care or bladder dysfunction” includes:

Supplies designed or intended for ostomy care and management, including collection devices, colostomy irrigation equipment and supplies, skin barriers or skin protectors, and other supplies especially designed for use of ostomates.

Supplies to be used exclusively by a person with bladder dysfunction, including catheters, collection devices, incontinent pads and pants, adult diapers, and other items used for the care and management of bladder dysfunction. For the purposes of this paragraph:

“Adult diapers” means diapers other than children’s diapers.

“Children’s diapers” means diapers marketed to be worn by children.

“Diaper” means an absorbent garment worn by humans who are incapable of, or have difficulty, controlling their bladder or bowel movements.

Gross receipts from the sale of electricity.

Gross receipts from the leasing or renting of any tangible personal property upon which a North Dakota sales tax or use tax has been paid or is payable and the retailer has separately indicated on an invoice, contract, lease agreement, or other supporting sale document that the retailer paid sales or use tax on the retailer’s purchase of the tangible personal property.

Gross receipts from all sales otherwise taxable under this chapter when made to any nonprofit organization for meals, including the containers, packages, and materials used for wrapping food items, for delivery to persons who are confined to their homes by illness or incapacity, including senior citizens and disabled persons, for consumption by such shut-ins in their homes.

Gross receipts from all sales of recreational travel trailers not exceeding eight feet [2.44 meters] in width or thirty-two feet [9.75 meters] in length which are designed to be principally used as temporary vacation dwellings when made to persons who are residents of other states which impose excise taxes upon registration of such recreational travel trailers.

Gross receipts from the sale of money, including all legal tender coins and currency, and from the sale of precious metal bullion that has been refined to a purity of not less than nine hundred ninety-nine parts per one thousand and is in such form or condition that its value depends upon its precious metal content and not its form.

Gross receipts from sales to nonprofit voluntary health associations which are exempt from federal income tax under section 501(c)(3) of the United States Internal Revenue Code [26 U.S.C. 501(c)(3)]. As used in this subsection, a voluntary health association is an organization recognized by the internal revenue service, the national health council, the state tax commissioner, and the North Dakota secretary of state as a nonprofit organization that is exempt under section 501(c)(3) of the United States Internal Revenue Code and meets the following requirements: It has been organized and operated exclusively in providing services for the purposes of preventing and alleviating human illness and injury. Methods used to obtain these goals would include education, research, community service, and direct patient services, income being derived solely from private donations with some exceptions of a minimal membership fee. Its members are not limited to only individuals, who themselves are licensed or otherwise legally authorized to render the same professional services as the organization. The disbursement of funds within a volunteer health association is to be controlled by a board of directors who work voluntarily and without pay.

Repealed by S.L. 2005, ch. 580, § 19.

Gross receipts from the sale of byproducts, arising from the processing of agricultural products, for use in the manufacture or generation of steam or electricity.

Gross receipts from the sale of a manufactured home that has been sold, bargained, exchanged, given away, or transferred by the person who first acquired it from a retailer in a sale at retail and upon which the North Dakota sales tax has previously been imposed.

Gross receipts from all sales of insulin in all its forms dispensed pursuant to the direction of a licensed physician, all sales of glucose usable for treatment of insulin reactions, all sales of urine and blood testing kits and materials, and all sales of insulin measuring and injecting devices, including insulin syringes and hypodermic needles.

Gross receipts from the sale of any aircraft taxable under the provisions of chapter 57-40.5.

Gross receipts from all sales of air carrier transportation property subject to ad valorem property taxation pursuant to the provisions of chapters 57-06, 57-07, 57-08, 57-13, and 57-32.

Gross receipts from sales of tangible personal property consisting of flight simulators or mechanical or electronic equipment for use in association with a flight simulator.

Gross receipts from sales of tickets or admissions to, or sales made at, an annual church supper or bazaar held in a publicly owned facility. For purposes of this subsection, “annual” means occurring not more than once in any calendar year.

Gross receipts from the initial sale of beneficiated coal.

Gross receipts from electronic gaming devices licensed by the attorney general under chapter 53-06.1.

Gross receipts from all sales made to a nonprofit medical research institute. For purposes of this subsection, “nonprofit medical research institute” means an institute that is a member of the association of independent research institutes, which is not a private foundation, and which is recognized by the internal revenue service as having exempt status under 26 U.S.C. 501(c)(3).

Gross receipts from all sales of coal that is exempt from the coal severance tax.

Gross receipts from the sale or lease of farm machinery, farm machinery repair parts, irrigation equipment, or irrigation equipment repair parts used exclusively for agricultural purposes.

Gross receipts from sales of tangible personal property purchased by a charitable organization to be awarded as a prize in a raffle conducted in accordance with law if the winner of the tangible personal property will be subject to sales or use taxes upon receiving the property.

Gross receipts from the sale of lottery tickets under chapter 53-12.1.

Gross receipts from all sales of tangible personal property purchased by a commerce authority and made a part of the infrastructure of a commerce authority, otherwise taxable under this chapter, if the personal property is placed within the geographic boundaries of the political subdivisions that created the commerce authority and is necessary and directly services infrastructure needs of the commerce authority. The commissioner shall issue a certificate of exemption to a political subdivision exempted by this subsection, and the political subdivision shall present the certificate of exemption to each retailer whenever the exemption is claimed.

Gross receipts from sales of carbon dioxide used for enhanced recovery of oil or natural gas or secure geologic storage.

Gross receipts from the sale at retail of hydrogen to power an internal combustion engine or fuel cell and equipment used directly and exclusively in production and storage of the hydrogen by a hydrogen generation facility in this state. For purposes of this subsection, “storage” means stationary and portable hydrogen containers or pressure vessels, piping, tubing, fittings, gaskets, controls, valves, gauges, pressure regulators, safety relief devices, and other accessories intended for hydrogen storage containers or pressure vessels.

Gross receipts from the sale of equipment to a facility, licensed under section 57-43.2-05, to enable the facility to sell diesel fuel containing at least two percent biodiesel or green diesel fuel as defined under section 57-43.2-01 by volume.

Gross receipts from sales within the boundaries of any reservation in this state to an individual who resides within the boundaries of any reservation in this state and who is an enrolled member of a federally recognized Indian tribe.

Gross receipts from sales of natural gas or sales of fuels used for heating purposes.

Gross receipts from the sale of items delivered electronically, including specified digital products. For purposes of this subsection:

“Specified digital products” means:

“Digital audio-visual works” which means a series of related images which, when shown in succession, impart an impression of motion, together with accompanying sounds, if any;

“Digital audio works” which means works that result from the fixation of a series of musical, spoken, or other sounds, including ringtones; and

“Digital books” which means works that are generally recognized in the ordinary and usual sense as books.

For purposes of the definition of “specified digital products”, “transferred electronically” means obtained by the purchaser by means other than tangible storage media.

For purposes of the definition of “digital audio work”, “ringtones” means digitized sound files that are downloaded onto a device and which may be used to alert the customer with respect to a communication.

“Specified digital products” may not be construed to include prewritten computer software as that term is defined in subdivision g of subsection 1 of section 57-39.2-02.1.

Gross receipts from memberships, admissions, and entrance fees to activities and events organized and operated by nonprofit social and recreation clubs organized under section 501(c)(7) of the Internal Revenue Code [26 U.S.C. 501(c)(7)] and operated solely by nonsalaried officers and staff.

Gross receipts from the sale of any potash or byproducts taxable under chapter 57-65.

Gross receipts from coin-operated amusement or entertainment machines.

(Contingent effective date — See note) Gross receipts from sales of liquefied natural gas used for agricultural, industrial, or railroad purposes as defined in section 57-43.2-01.

Gross receipts from all sales of commemorative memorial coins under section 37-18-15.

(Effective through August 31, 2022) Gross receipts from sales to a senior citizen organization that provides informational, health, wel- fare, counseling, and referral services for senior citizens in this state if the senior citizen organization:

Is recognized by the internal revenue service as having exempt status under 26 U.S.C. 501(c)(3);

Is recognized by the secretary of state as a charitable organization; and

Either:

Provides services through the aging services division of the department of human services; or

Receives grant funds through the department of transportation under the federal transit administration’s enhanced mobility of seniors and individuals with disabilities program [49 U.S.C. 5310].

“Durable medical equipment” includes equipment and devices designed or intended for ostomy care and management and equipment and devices used exclusively for a person with bladder dysfunction. An exemption certificate is not required to obtain exemption. Repair and replacement parts as used in this definition include all components or attachments used in conjunction with the durable medical equipment. Repair and replacement parts do not include items which are for single patient use only.

“Mobility-enhancing equipment” includes crutches and wheelchairs for the use of disabled persons, equipment, including manual control units, van lifts, van door opening units, and raised roofs for attaching to or modifying a motor vehicle for use by a permanently physically disabled person, equipment, including elevators, dumbwaiters, chair lifts, and bedroom or bathroom lifts, whether or not sold for attaching to real property, for use by a permanently physically disabled person in that person’s principal dwelling, and equipment, including manual control units, for attaching to or modifying motorized implements of husbandry for use by a permanently physically disabled person.

“Prosthetic device” includes artificial devices individually designed, constructed, or altered solely for the use of a particular disabled person so as to become a brace, support, supplement, correction, or substitute for the bodily structure, including the extremities of the individual, artificial limbs, artificial eyes, hearing aids, and other equipment worn as a correction or substitute for any functioning portion of the body, artificial teeth sold by a dentist, and eyeglasses when especially designed or prescribed by an ophthalmologist, physician, oculist, or optometrist for the personal use of the owner or purchaser.

60.

(Effective after August 31, 2022)

Gross receipts from sales to a senior citizen organization that provides informational, health, welfare, counseling, and referral services for senior citizens in this state if the senior citizen organization:;

a.

Is recognized by the internal revenue service as having exempt status under 26 U.S.C.501(c)(3);

b.

Is recognized by the secretary of state as a charitable organization; and

c.

Either:

(1)

Provides services through the aging services division of the department of health and human services; or

(2)

Receives grant funds through the department of transportation under the federal transit administration's enhanced mobility of seniors and individuals with disabilities program [49 U.S.C. 5310].

Source:

S.L. 1967, ch. 459, § 4; 1967, ch. 460, § 2; 1969, ch. 472, § 3; 1969, ch. 520, § 1; 1969, ch. 521, § 1; 1969, ch. 522, § 1; 1969, ch. 523, § 1; 1969, ch. 528, § 24; 1971, ch. 176, § 2; 1971, ch. 555, § 3; 1971, ch. 567, § 1; 1971, ch. 568, § 1; 1971, ch. 569, § 1; 1971, ch. 570, § 1; 1971, ch. 571, § 1; 1971, ch. 572, § 1; 1973, ch. 479, § 1; 1973, ch. 480, §§ 1, 6; 1973, ch. 481, § 1; 1975, ch. 546, § 1; 1975, ch. 547, § 1; 1975, ch. 548, § 1; 1975, ch. 549, § 1; 1975, ch. 550, § 1; 1975, ch. 551, § 1; 1977, ch. 543, § 1; 1977, ch. 544, § 2; 1977, ch. 545, § 1; 1977, ch. 546, § 1; I.M. approved November 2, 1976, S.L. 1977, ch. 593, § 4; 1979, ch. 598, § 6; 1979, ch. 615, § 2; 1979, ch. 616, § 1; 1979, ch. 617, § 1; 1979, ch. 618, § 1; 1981, ch. 598, § 3; 1981, ch. 601, § 2; 1981, ch. 602, § 2; 1981, ch. 603, § 1; 1981, ch. 604, § 1; 1981, ch. 605, §§ 1, 2; 1983, ch. 592, § 6; 1983, ch. 644, § 2; 1983, ch. 647, § 2; 1987, ch. 670, § 2; 1987, ch. 709, § 1; 1987, ch. 710, § 1; 1987, ch. 711, § 1; 1989, ch. 170, § 8; 1989, ch. 317, § 13; 1989, ch. 717, § 1; 1989, ch. 718, § 1; 1989, ch. 719, § 1; 1991, ch. 677, § 1; 1991, ch. 678, § 1; 1993, ch. 562, § 1; 1993, ch. 563, § 1; 1993, ch. 564, § 1; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 1997, ch. 496, § 2; 1997, ch. 497, § 1; 1999, ch. 164, § 11; 2001, ch. 534, § 3; 2001, ch. 535, § 3; 2001, ch. 536, § 2; 2001, ch. 537, § 1; 2003, ch. 96, § 21; 2003, ch. 454, § 6; 2003, ch. 524, § 5; 2003, ch. 536, § 1; 2003, ch. 539, §§ 6 to 10; 2005, ch. 15, § 40; 2005, ch. 94, § 5; 2005, ch. 470, § 7; 2005, ch. 571, §§ 1, 2; 2005, ch. 572, § 1; 2005, ch. 573, § 1; 2005, ch. 574, § 3; 2005, ch. 575, § 1; 2005, ch. 580, §§ 7, 19; 2005, ch. 582, § 2; 2007, ch. 513, § 3; 2007, ch. 528, § 5; 2007, ch. 529, §§ 3, 4; 2009, ch. 556, §§ 3, 4; 2009, ch. 557, § 2; 2009, ch. 560, § 1; 2009, ch. 561, § 1; 2009, ch. 562, § 1; 2009, ch. 563, § 1; 2011, ch. 460, § 13; 2011, ch. 468, § 1; 2011, ch. 466, § 1; 2011, ch. 467, § 1; 2011, ch. 465, § 3; 2011, ch. 486, § 2; 2013, ch. 459, § 1; 2013, ch. 458, § 2; 2015, ch. 451, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2015, ch. 452, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2015, ch. 453, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2019 ch. 95, § 4, eff for taxable events occurring after June 30, 2019; 2019, ch. 296, § 3, effective July 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 341, § 6, effective July 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 477, § 7, eff for taxable events occurring after June 30, 2019; 2021, ch. 199, § 4, eff for taxable events occurring after June 30, 2021; 2021, ch. 471, 2021, ch. 471, § 1, eff for taxable events occurring after June 30, 2021, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 472, § 1, eff for taxable events occurring after June 30, 2021; 2021, ch. 352, § 503, effective September 1, 2022.

Note.

The reference in subsection 4 to section 15.1-07-12 was corrected under section 46-03-10 because the history of this section and section 15-29-13 indicate that the reference should be to section 15.1-07-10 or 15.1-07-11.

Section 57-39.2-04 was amended 4 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 503 of Chapter 352, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1247; Section 4 of Chapter 199, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2226; Section 1 of Chapter 472, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1351; and Section 1 of Chapter 471, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2152.

Section 57-39.2-04 was amended 4 times by the 2019 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 6 of Chapter 341, Session Laws 2019, Senate Bill 2193; Section 4 of Chapter 95, Session Laws 2019, Senate Bill 2192; Section 7 of Chapter 477, Session Laws 2019, Senate Bill 2089; and Section 3 of Chapter 296, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1131.

Cross-References.

Exemptions from taxation, see Const., Art. X, § 5.

Motor vehicle excise tax, see N.D.C.C. ch. 57-40.3.

57-39.2-04.1.
Sales tax exemption for food and food ingredients.

Gross receipts from sales for human consumption of food and food ingredients are exempt from taxes imposed under this chapter. Gross receipts from sales for human consumption of food and food products given, or to be given, as samples to consumers for consumption on the premises of a food store are exempt from the sales tax imposed by this chapter. For purposes of this section, “food and food ingredients” means substances, whether in liquid, concentrated, solid, frozen, dried, or dehydrated form, that are sold for ingestion or chewing by humans and are consumed for taste or nutritional value.

For purposes of this section, “food” and “food ingredients” do not include:

Alcoholic beverages.

Candy or chewing gum.

Dietary supplements.

Prepared food.

Soft drinks containing fifty percent or less fruit juice.

Tobacco.

For purposes of this section:

“Alcoholic beverages” means beverages that are suitable for human consumption and contain one-half of one percent or more of alcohol by volume.

“Candy” means a preparation of sugar, honey, or other natural or artificial sweeteners in combination with chocolate, fruits, nuts, or other ingredients or flavoring in the form of bars, drops, or pieces. Candy does not include any preparation containing flour and does not require refrigeration.

“Dietary supplement” means any product, other than tobacco, intended to supplement the diet which contains one or more of the following dietary ingredients: a vitamin; a mineral; an herb or other botanical; an amino acid; a dietary substance for use by humans to supplement the diet by increasing the total dietary intake; an oral concentrate, metabolite, constitute, extract, or combination of any dietary ingredients described in this sentence and which is intended for ingestion in tablet, capsule, powder, soft gel, gel cap, or liquid form, or if not represented for use as a sole item of a meal or of a diet; and is required to be labeled as a dietary supplement, identifiable by the supplemental facts box found on the label and as required pursuant to 21 CFR section 101.36.

“Prepared food” means:

Food sold in a heated state or heated by the seller;

Two or more food ingredients mixed or combined by the seller for sale as a single item; or

Food sold with eating utensils provided by the seller, including plates, knives, forks, spoons, glasses, cups, napkins, or straws. A plate does not include a container or packaging used to transport the food.

“Prepared food” does not mean:

Food that is only cut, repackaged, or pasteurized by the seller.

Eggs, fish, meat, poultry, and foods containing these raw animal foods requiring cooking by the consumer as recommended by the food and drug administration in chapter 3, part 401.11, of its food code so as to prevent foodborne illness.

If sold without eating utensils provided by the seller:

Food sold by a seller whose proper primary North American industry classification system classification is manufacturing in sector 311, except subsector 3118, bakeries.

Food sold in an unheated state by weight or volume as a single item.

Bakery items, including bread, rolls, buns, biscuits, bagels, croissants, pastries, donuts, Danish, cakes, tortes, pies, tarts, muffins, bars, cookies, and tortillas.

Food sold that ordinarily requires additional cooking, as opposed to just reheating, by the consumer prior to consumption.

“Soft drinks” means nonalcoholic beverages that contain natural or artificial sweeteners. “Soft drinks” does not include beverages that contain milk or milk products, soy, rice, or similar milk substitutes, or greater than fifty percent of vegetable or fruit juice by volume.

“Tobacco” means cigarettes, cigars, chewing or pipe tobacco, or any other item that contains tobacco.

For purposes of this section, “eating utensils provided by the seller” is determined as follows:

Determine the prepared food ratio, where the numerator is the sum of food defined in paragraphs 1 and 2 of subdivision d of subsection 2 plus food when plates, bowls, glasses, or cups are necessary for the purchaser to receive the food and the denominator is all sales of food and food ingredients, including prepared food, candy, dietary supplements, and soft drinks. Alcoholic beverages are not included in either the numerator or denominator.

If the prepared food ratio is seventy-five percent or less, utensils are provided by the seller if the seller’s practice is to physically give or hand them to the purchaser, except plates, bowls, glasses, or cups necessary for the purchaser to receive the food need only be made available.

If the prepared food ratio is greater than seventy-five percent, utensils are provided by the seller if they are made available to the purchaser. When sellers with a food ratio greater than seventy-five percent sell items that contain four or more servings packaged as one item and sold for a single price, the item does not become prepared food unless the seller’s practice is to physically give or hand the purchaser utensils as in subdivision b. Serving size is determined by the label of the item sold. If no label is available, the seller will reasonably determine the number of servings.

When a seller sells food items that have a utensil placed in a package by a person other than the seller and that person’s North American industry classification system classification code is that of manufacturers (sector 311), the seller shall not be considered to have provided the utensils except as in subdivisions b and c. For any other packager with any other North American industry classification system classification code, the seller shall be considered to have provided the utensil.

The prepared food ratio is to be calculated by the seller for each calendar or fiscal year not later than ninety days after the end of each year and based on the seller’s data from the previous year.

A single prepared food ratio will be determined annually and used for all of the seller’s locations in the state.

A new business shall make a good-faith estimate of the prepared food ratio for the first year and shall adjust its good-faith estimate after the first three months if the actual prepared food ratio is materially different than the estimate.

Source:

S.L. 1969, ch. 528, § 18; 1973, ch. 465, § 4; 1981, ch. 598, § 4; 1985, ch. 639, § 1; 1987, ch. 712, § 1; 1989, ch. 718, § 2; 1989, ch. 720, § 1; 2003, ch. 539, § 11; 2005, ch. 15, § 40; 2005, ch. 580, § 8; 2005, ch. 582, § 2; 2007, ch. 528, § 6; 2009, ch. 556, § 5; 2015, ch. 459, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

Cross-References.

Food Security Act of 1985, see Pub. L. 99-198.

Food Stamp Act of 1977, see 7 USCS 2011 et seq.

57-39.2-04.2.
Sales tax exemption for power plant construction, production, environmental upgrade, and repowering equipment and oil refinery or gas processing plant environmental upgrade equipment.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Environmental upgrade” means an investment greater than twenty-five million dollars or one hundred thousand dollars per megawatt of installed nameplate capacity, whichever is less, in machinery, equipment, and related facilities for reducing emissions or increasing efficiency at an existing power plant.

“Environmental upgrade” for purposes of a process unit means an investment greater than one hundred thousand dollars in machinery, equipment, and related facilities for reducing emissions, increasing efficiency, or enhancing reliability of the equipment at a new or existing process unit.

“Operator” means any person owning, holding, or leasing a power plant or process unit.

“Power plant” means:

An electrical generating plant, and all additions to the plant, which processes or converts coal in its natural form or beneficiated coal into electrical power and which has at least one single electrical energy generation unit with a capacity of fifty thousand kilowatts or more.

A wind-powered electrical generating facility, on which construction is completed before January 1, 2017, and all additions to the facility, which provides electrical power through wind generation and which has at least one single electrical energy generation unit with a nameplate capacity of one hundred kilowatts or more.

Any other type of electrical power generating facility excluding the types of power plants identified in paragraphs 1 and 2 which has a capacity of one hundred kilowatts or more and produces electricity for resale or for consumption in a business activity.

“Process unit” means an oil refinery or gas processing plant and all adjacent units that are utilized in the processing of crude oil or natural gas.

“Production equipment” means machinery and attachment units, other than replacement parts, directly and exclusively used in the generation, transmission, or distribution of electrical energy for sale by a power plant.

“Repowering” means an investment of more than two hundred million dollars or one million dollars per megawatt of installed nameplate capacity, whichever is less, in an existing power plant that modifies or replaces the process used for converting coal in its natural form or beneficiated coal into electrical power.

Sales of production or environmental upgrade equipment that is delivered on or after January 1, 2007, and used exclusively in power plants or repowering existing power plants or in processing units are exempt from the tax imposed by this chapter.

Sales of tangible personal property, other than production or environmental upgrade equipment, which is used in the construction of new power plants or to expand existing power plants or to add environmental upgrades to existing power plants or repowering existing power plants or to add environmental upgrades to existing process units are exempt from the tax imposed by this chapter.

To receive the exemption at the time of purchase, the operator must receive from the commissioner a certificate that the tangible personal property or production equipment the operator intends to purchase qualifies for the exemption. If a certificate is not received prior to the purchase, the operator shall pay the applicable tax imposed by this chapter and apply to the commissioner for a refund.

If the tangible personal property or production equipment is purchased or installed by a contractor subject to the tax imposed by this chapter, the operator may apply for a refund of the difference between the amount remitted by the contractor and the exemption imposed or allowed by this section.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 679, § 1; 2001, ch. 538, § 1; 2005, ch. 576, § 1; 2005, ch. 577, § 1; 2007, ch. 516, § 2; 2007, ch. 530, § 1; 2009, ch. 562, § 2; 2009, ch. 564, § 1; 2013, ch. 460, § 1; 2015, ch. 453, § 2.